Wisconsin, session 2025, SB211.
do enact as follows:SB211,13Section 1. 101.123 (3) (n) of the statutes is created to read:SB211,1,44101.123 (3) (n) A tobacco bar that satisfies all of the following:SB211,1,551. The tobacco bar came into existence on or after June 4, 2009.SB211,2,112. Only the smoking of cigars and pipes is allowed in the tobacco bar.SB211,2,323. The tobacco bar is not a retail food establishment, as defined in s. 97.30 (1) 3(c).SB211,2,44